Washington statutes.
RCW 18.390.040

Department of social and health services—Duties—Fees—Effect of registration activities.

(1) The department shall:

(a) Register an entity that submits a complete application that includes all of the materials required in RCW 18.390.030;

(b) Review the disclosure statements submitted by applicants for an initial or renewal registration to operate a continuing care retirement community for completeness;

(c) Establish and collect a fee that is sufficient to cover the department's costs associated with administering the requirements of this chapter; and

(d) Create and maintain an online listing that is readily available to the public of the names and addresses of continuing care retirement communities that are registered with the department.

(2) The department's registration activities consist of reviewing an application for completeness and do not signify that the department has otherwise issued a certification or license to the continuing care retirement community or any of its component parts.

[ 2016 c 183 s 4.]